Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2467.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 406(a)(3) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended to read:Section 406. Sales by Liquor Licensees; Restrictions.--(a)* * *(3) Hotel and restaurant liquor licensees, municipal golf course restaurant liquor licensees and privately-owned public 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 golf course restaurant licensees may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages on Sunday between the hours of [nine] seven o'clock antemeridian and two o'clock antemeridian Monday upon purchase of a special permit from the board at an annual fee as prescribed in section 614-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929." Airport restaurant liquor licensees may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages on Sunday between the hours of five o'clock antemeridian and two o'clock antemeridian Monday upon purchase of a special permit from the board at an annual fee as prescribed in section 614-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929."* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2467PN3344 - 2 - 1234567891011121314